Utah statutes.
4-31-114.   Report of vesicular disease.

(1)  A person who identifies symptoms of vesicular disease in livestock shall immediately report it to the department.

(2)  Failure of a veterinarian licensed in this state to report a diagnosed case of vesicular disease to the department constitutes ground for the revocation of such veterinarian's license.

(3)  Failure by an owner of livestock to report symptoms of vesicular disease among the owner's livestock constitutes forfeiture of the right to claim an indemnity for an animal slaughtered on account of the disease.

